Ohio, session 136, HB577.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3375.011, 3501.01, 3503.10, 3503.11, 3503.13, 3503.15, 3503.153, 3503.19, 3503.20, 3503.28, 3505.19, 3509.04, 3509.05, 3509.06, 3509.07, 3509.08, 3511.05, 3511.09, 4501.023, and 4507.01 be amended and section 3509.11 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3375.011. Any (A) As used in this section, "photo identification" and "copy" of an individual's photo identification have the same meanings as in section 3501.01 of the Revised Code. (B) Upon request by an individual, any library organized under Chapter 3375. of the Revised Code shall provide free of charge to any individual a photocopy of that individual's driver's license, temporary driver's permit, or state identification card, if the individual requests one. (C) Upon request by an elector, any library organized under Chapter 3375. of the Revised Code shall provide free of charge to the elector a copy of the elector's photo identification for the purpose of casting absent voter's ballots by mail. Sec. 3501.01. As used in the sections of the Revised Code relating to elections and political communications: (A) "General election" means the election held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in each November. (B) "Regular municipal election" means the election held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in each odd-numbered year. (C) "Regular state election" means the election held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in each even-numbered year. (D) "Special election" means any election other than those elections defined in other divisions of this section. A special election may be held only on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in May or November, on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in August in accordance with section 3501.022 of the Revised Code, or on the day authorized by a particular municipal or county charter for the holding of a primary election, except that in any year in which a presidential primary election is held, no special election shall be held in May, except as authorized by a municipal or county charter, but may be held on the third Tuesday after the first Monday in March. (E)(1) "Primary" or "primary election" means an election held for the purpose of nominating persons as candidates of political parties for election to offices, and for the purpose of electing persons as members of the controlling committees of political parties and as delegates and alternates to the conventions of political parties. Primary elections shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in May of each year except in years in which a presidential primary election is held. (2) "Presidential primary election" means a primary election as defined by division (E)(1) of this section at which an election is held for the purpose of choosing delegates and alternates to the national conventions of the major political parties pursuant to section 3513.12 of the Revised Code. Unless otherwise specified, presidential primary elections are included in references to primary elections. In years in which a presidential primary election is held, all primary elections shall be held on the third Tuesday after the first Monday in March except as otherwise authorized by a municipal or county charter. (F) "Political party" means any group of voters meeting the requirements set forth in section 3517.01 of the Revised Code for the formation and existence of a political party. (1) "Major political party" means any political party organized under the laws of this state whose candidate for governor or nominees for presidential electors received not less than twenty per cent of the total vote cast for such office at the most recent regular state election. (2) "Minor political party" means any political party organized under the laws of this state that meets either of the following requirements: (a) Except as otherwise provided in this division, the political party's candidate for governor or nominees for presidential electors received less than twenty per cent but not less than three per cent of the total vote cast for such office at the most recent regular state election. A political party that meets the requirements of this division remains a political party for a period of four years after meeting those requirements. (b) The political party has filed with the secretary of state, subsequent to its failure to meet the requirements of division (F)(2)(a) of this section, a petition that meets the requirements of section 3517.01 of the Revised Code. A newly formed political party shall be known as a minor political party until the time of the first election for governor or president which occurs not less than twelve months subsequent to the formation of such party, after which election the status of such party shall be determined by the vote for the office of governor or president. (G) "Dominant party in a precinct" or "dominant political party in a precinct" means that political party whose candidate for election to the office of governor at the most recent regular state election at which a governor was elected received more votes than any other person received for election to that office in such precinct at such election. (H) "Candidate" means any qualified person certified in accordance with the provisions of the Revised Code for placement on the official ballot of a primary, general, or special election to be held in this state, or any qualified person who claims to be a write-in candidate, or who knowingly assents to being represented as a write-in candidate by another at either a primary, general, or special election to be held in this state. (I) "Independent candidate" means any candidate who claims not to be affiliated with a political party, and whose name has been certified on the office-type ballot at a general or special election through the filing of a statement of candidacy and nominating petition, as prescribed in section 3513.257 of the Revised Code. (J) "Nonpartisan candidate" means any candidate whose name is required, pursuant to section 3505.04 of the Revised Code, to be listed on the nonpartisan ballot, including all candidates for judge of a municipal court, county court, or court of common pleas, for member of any board of education, for municipal or township offices in which primary elections are not held for nominating candidates by political parties, and for offices of municipal corporations having charters that provide for separate ballots for elections for these offices. (K) "Party candidate" means any candidate who claims to be a member of a political party and who has been certified to appear on the office-type ballot at a general or special election as the nominee of a political party because the candidate has won the primary election of the candidate's party for the public office the candidate seeks, has been nominated under section 3517.012, or is selected by party committee in accordance with section 3513.31 of the Revised Code. (L) "Officer of a political party" includes, but is not limited to, any member, elected or appointed, of a controlling committee, whether representing the territory of the state, a district therein, a county, township, a city, a ward, a precinct, or other territory, of a major or minor political party. (M) "Question or issue" means any question or issue certified in accordance with the Revised Code for placement on an official ballot at a general or special election to be held in this state. (N) "Elector" or "qualified elector" means a person having the qualifications provided by law to be entitled to vote. (O) "Voter" means an elector who votes at an election. (P) "Voting residence" means that place of residence of an elector which shall determine the precinct in which the elector may vote. (Q) "Precinct" means a district within a county established by the board of elections of such county within which all qualified electors having a voting residence therein may vote at the same polling place. (R) "Polling place" means that place provided for each precinct at which the electors having a voting residence in such precinct may vote. (S) "Board" or "board of elections" means the board of elections appointed in a county pursuant to section 3501.06 of the Revised Code. (T) "Political subdivision" means a county, township, city, village, or school district. (U) "Election officer" or "election official" means any of the following: (1) Secretary of state; (2) Employees of the secretary of state serving the division of elections in the capacity of attorney, administrative officer, administrative assistant, elections administrator, office manager, or clerical supervisor; (3) Director of a board of elections; (4) Deputy director of a board of elections; (5) Member of a board of elections; (6) Employees of a board of elections; (7) Precinct election officials; (8) Employees appointed by the boards of elections on a temporary or part-time basis. (V) "Acknowledgment notice" means a notice sent by a board of elections, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, informing a voter registration applicant or an applicant who wishes to change the applicant's residence or name of the status of the application; the information necessary to complete or update the application, if any; and if the application is complete, the precinct in which the applicant is to vote. (W) "Confirmation notice" means a notice sent by a board of elections, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, to a registered elector to confirm the registered elector's current address. (X) "Designated agency" means an office or agency in the state that provides public assistance or that provides state-funded programs primarily engaged in providing services to persons with disabilities and that is required by the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 to implement a program designed and administered by the secretary of state for registering voters, or any other public or government office or agency that implements a program designed and administered by the secretary of state for registering voters, including the department of job and family services, the program administered under section 3701.132 of the Revised Code by the department of health, the department of mental health and addiction services, the department of developmental disabilities, the opportunities for Ohioans with disabilities agency, and any other agency the secretary of state designates. "Designated agency" does not include public high schools and vocational schools, public libraries, or the office of a county treasurer. (Y) "National Voter Registration Act of 1993" means the "National Voter Registration Act of 1993," 107 Stat. 77, 42 U.S.C.A. 1973gg. (Z) "Voting Rights Act of 1965" means the "Voting Rights Act of 1965," 79 Stat. 437, 42 U.S.C.A. 1973, as amended. (AA)(1) "Photo identification" means one of the following documents that includes the individual's name and photograph and is not expired: (a) An Ohio driver's license, state identification card, or interim identification form issued by the registrar of motor vehicles or a deputy registrar under Chapter 4506. or 4507. of the Revised Code; (b) A United States passport or passport card; (c) A United States military identification card, Ohio national guard identification card, or United States department of veterans affairs identification card. (2) A "copy" of an individual's photo identification means a physical paper that contains legible images of both the front and back of a document described in division (AA)(1) of this section, except that if the document is a United States passport, a copy of the photo identification means an a physical paper that contains a legible image of the passport's identification page that includes the individual's name, photograph, and other identifying information and the passport's expiration date. (BB) "Driver's license" means a license or permit issued by the registrar or a deputy registrar under Chapter 4506. or 4507. of the Revised Code that authorizes an individual to drive. "Driver's license" includes a driver's license, commercial driver's license, probationary license, restricted license, motorcycle operator's license, or temporary instruction permit identification card. "Driver's license" does not include a limited term license issued under section 4506.14 or 4507.09 of the Revised Code. (CC) "State identification card" means a card issued by the registrar or a deputy registrar under sections 4507.50 to 4507.52 of the Revised Code. (DD) "Interim identification form" means the document issued by the registrar or a deputy registrar to an applicant for a driver's license or state identification card that contains all of the information otherwise found on the license or card and that an applicant may use as a form of identification until the physical license or card arrives in the mail. Sec. 3503.10. (A) Each designated agency shall designate one person within that agency to serve as coordinator for the voter registration program within the agency and its departments, divisions, and programs. The designated person shall be trained under a program designed by the secretary of state and shall be responsible for administering all aspects of the voter registration program for that agency as prescribed by the secretary of state. The designated person shall receive no additional compensation for performing such duties. (B) Every designated agency, public high school and vocational school, public library, and office of a county treasurer shall provide in each of its offices or locations voter registration applications and assistance in the registration of persons qualified to register to vote, in accordance with this chapter, and, upon request, shall provide electors with copies of their photo identification without charge, in accordance with section 3509.11 of the Revised Code. (C) Every designated agency shall distribute to its applicants, prior to or in conjunction with distributing a voter registration application, a form prescribed by the secretary of state that includes all of the following: (1) The question, "Do you want to register to vote or update your current voter registration?"--followed by boxes for the applicant to indicate whether the applicant would like to register or decline to register to vote, and the statement, highlighted in bold print, "If you do not check either box, you will be considered to have decided not to register to vote at this time."; (2) If the agency provides public assistance, the statement, "Applying to register or declining to register to vote will not affect the amount of assistance that you will be provided by this agency."; (3) The statement, "If you would like help in filling out the voter registration application form, we will help you. The decision whether to seek or accept help is yours. You may fill out the application form in private."; (4) The statement, "If you believe that someone has interfered with your right to register or to decline to register to vote, your right to privacy in deciding whether to register or in applying to register to vote, or your right to choose your own political party or other political preference, you may file a complaint with the prosecuting attorney of your county or with the secretary of state," with the address and telephone number for each such official's office. (D) Each designated agency shall distribute a voter registration form prescribed by the secretary of state to each applicant with each application for service or assistance, and with each written application or form for recertification, renewal, or change of address. (E) Each designated agency shall do all of the following: (1) Have employees trained to administer the voter registration program in order to provide to each applicant who wishes to register to vote and who accepts assistance, the same degree of assistance with regard to completion of the voter registration application as is provided by the agency with regard to the completion of its own form; (2) Accept completed voter registration applications, voter registration change of residence forms, and voter registration change of name forms, regardless of whether the application or form was distributed by the designated agency, for transmittal to the office of the board of elections in the county in which the agency is located. Each designated agency and the appropriate board of elections shall establish a method by which the voter registration applications and other voter registration forms are transmitted to that board of elections within five days after being accepted by the agency. (3) If the designated agency is one that is primarily engaged in providing services to persons with disabilities under a state-funded program, and that agency provides services to a person with disabilities at a person's home, provide the services described in divisions (E)(1) and (2) of this section at the person's home; (4) Keep as confidential, except as required by the secretary of state for record-keeping purposes, the identity of an agency through which a person registered to vote or updated the person's voter registration records, and information relating to a declination to register to vote made in connection with a voter registration application issued by a designated agency. (F) The secretary of state shall prepare and transmit written instructions on the implementation of the voter registration program within each designated agency, public high school and vocational school, public library, and office of a county treasurer. The instructions shall include directions as follows: (1) That each person designated to assist with voter registration maintain strict neutrality with respect to a person's political philosophies, a person's right to register or decline to register, and any other matter that may influence a person's decision to register or not register to vote; (2) That each person designated to assist with voter registration not seek to influence a person's decision to register or not register to vote, not display or demonstrate any political preference or party allegiance, and not make any statement to a person or take any action the purpose or effect of which is to lead a person to believe that a decision to register or not register has any bearing on the availability of services or benefits offered, on the grade in a particular class in school, or on credit for a particular class in school; (3) Regarding when and how to assist a person in completing the voter registration application, what to do with the completed voter registration application or voter registration update form, and when the application must be transmitted to the appropriate board of elections; (4) Regarding what records must be kept by the agency and where and when those records should be transmitted to satisfy reporting requirements imposed on the secretary of state under the National Voter Registration Act of 1993; (5) Regarding whom to contact to obtain answers to questions about voter registration forms and procedures. (G) If the voter registration activity is part of an in-class voter registration program in a public high school or vocational school, whether prescribed by the secretary of state or independent of the secretary of state, the board of education shall do all of the following: (1) Establish a schedule of school days and hours during these days when the person designated to assist with voter registration shall provide voter registration assistance; (2) Designate a person to assist with voter registration from the public high school's or vocational school's staff; (3) Make voter registration applications and materials available, as outlined in the voter registration program established by the secretary of state pursuant to section 3501.05 of the Revised Code; (4) Distribute the statement, "applying to register or declining to register to vote will not affect or be a condition of your receiving a particular grade in or credit for a school course or class, participating in a curricular or extracurricular activity, receiving a benefit or privilege, or participating in a program or activity otherwise available to pupils enrolled in this school district's schools."; (5) Establish a method by which the voter registration application and other voter registration forms are transmitted to the board of elections within five days after being accepted by the public high school or vocational school. (H) Any person employed by the designated agency, public high school or vocational school, public library, or office of a county treasurer may be designated to assist with voter registration pursuant to this section. The designated agency, public high school or vocational school, public library, or office of a county treasurer shall provide the designated person, and make available such space as may be necessary, without charge to the county or state. (I) The secretary of state shall prepare and cause to be displayed in a prominent location in each designated agency a notice that identifies the person designated to assist with voter registration, the nature of that person's duties, and where and when that person is available for assisting in the registration of voters. A designated agency may furnish additional supplies and services to disseminate information to increase public awareness of the existence of a person designated to assist with voter registration in every designated agency. (J) This section does not limit any authority a board of education, superintendent, or principal has to allow, sponsor, or promote voluntary election registration programs within a high school or vocational school, including programs in which pupils serve as persons designated to assist with voter registration, provided that no pupil is required to participate. (K) Each public library and office of the county treasurer shall establish a method by which voter registration forms are transmitted to the board of elections within five days after being accepted by the public library or office of the county treasurer. (L) The department of job and family services and its departments, divisions, and programs shall limit administration of the aspects of the voter registration program for the department to the requirements prescribed by the secretary of state and the requirements of this section and the National Voter Registration Act of 1993. Sec. 3503.11. (A)(1) When any person applies for a driver's license, commercial driver's license, a state of Ohio identification card issued under section 4507.50 of the Revised Code, or motorcycle operator's license or endorsement, or the renewal or duplicate of any license or endorsement under Chapter 4506. or 4507. of the Revised Code, and the person presents proof of United States citizenship to the registrar of motor vehicles or the deputy registrar or has previously presented proof of United States citizenship to the registrar or any deputy registrar, the registrar or deputy registrar shall offer the applicant the opportunity to register to vote or to update the applicant's voter registration by electronic means in conjunction with the person's transaction with the registrar or deputy registrar, in a manner prescribed by the secretary of state. (2) When any person submits a notice of change of address to the registrar under division (C) of section 4507.09 of the Revised Code, the registrar shall offer the applicant the opportunity to submit a notice of change of address for voter registration purposes by electronic means in conjunction with the person's transaction with the registrar, in a manner prescribed by the secretary of state. (3) When a person registers to vote or updates the person's voter registration under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, the registrar or deputy registrar shall electronically transmit the person's signature that is on file with the bureau of motor vehicles with the electronic record of the voter registration or update, and that signature shall be considered the person's signature on the voter registration or update and for all other election and signature-matching purposes. (B) Within twenty-four hours after a person registers to vote or updates the person's voter registration under division (A) of this section, the registrar or deputy registrar shall transmit the electronic record of the voter registration or update to the secretary of state by electronic means in a manner prescribed by the secretary of state by rule. Rules adopted under this division shall do all of the following: (1) Prohibit any direct electronic connection between the office of the registrar or a deputy registrar and the statewide voter registration database; (2) Require any voter registration information to be verified by the secretary of state or a board of elections before the information is added to the statewide voter registration database; (3) Require the registrar or deputy registrar to electronically date stamp each electronic record in a manner that does not disclose the identity of the office that receives the voter registration or update. (C)(1) The registrar of motor vehicles and each deputy registrar also shall make available to all other customers paper voter registration applications and update forms, but are not required to offer assistance to customers in completing those forms. The bureau of motor vehicles shall supply all of its deputy registrars with a sufficient number of voter registration applications and update forms. (2) Within five days after a person submits a completed paper voter registration application or update form to the registrar or a deputy registrar, the registrar or deputy registrar shall send the form to the board of elections of the county in which the office of the registrar or deputy registrar is located. (D) The registrar shall collect from each deputy registrar through the reports filed under division (J) of section 4503.03 of the Revised Code and transmit to the secretary of state information on the number of voter registration applications and change of residence or change of name forms completed or declined, and any additional information required by the secretary of state to comply with the National Voter Registration Act of 1993. No information relating to an applicant's decision to decline to register or update the applicant's voter registration at the office of the registrar or deputy registrar may be used for any purpose other than voter registration record-keeping required by the secretary of state, and all such information shall be kept confidential. (E) Upon request, the registrar or a deputy registrar shall provide an elector with a copy of the elector's photo identification without charge, in accordance with section 3509.11 of the Revised Code. The registrar shall provide a homebound elector with a copy of the elector's photo identification without charge, in accordance with section 3509.11 of the Revised Code and as part of the bureau's homebound identification program. Sec. 3503.13. (A)(1) (A) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(2) (B) of this section, voter registration forms submitted by applicants and the statewide voter registration database established under section 3503.15 of the Revised Code are public records subject to disclosure under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (2) (B) None of the following in the possession of the secretary of state or a board of elections are subject to disclosure under division (A)(1) of this section as public records: (a) (1) An elector's full or partial social security number, driver's license or state identification card number, telephone number, or electronic mail address; (b) (2) A copy of an elector's photo identification; (3) A confidential voter registration record, as described in section 111.44 of the Revised Code; (c) (4) The address of a designated public service worker, if the designated public service worker has submitted a redaction request to the board of elections under section 149.45 of the Revised Code; (d) (5) Any other information that is prohibited from being disclosed by state or federal law. (B) (C) Subject to the other applicable requirements of Title XXXV of the Revised Code, the secretary of state shall prescribe procedures for the office of the secretary of state and the boards of elections to store and dispose of electronic files and physical documents that contain information described in division (B) of this section in order to prevent the disclosure of that information to the public. (D) A board of elections may use a legible digitized signature list of voter signatures, copied from the signatures on the registration forms in a form and manner prescribed by the secretary of state, provided that the board includes the required voter registration information in the statewide voter registration database established under section 3503.15 of the Revised Code, and provided that the precinct election officials have computer printouts at the polls prepared in the manner required under section 3503.23 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3503.15. (A) The secretary of state shall establish and maintain a statewide voter registration database that shall be administered by the office of data analytics and archives in the office of the secretary of state and made continuously available to each board of elections and to other agencies as authorized by law. The statewide voter registration database shall be the official list of registered electors for all elections conducted in this state. (B) The statewide voter registration database shall, at a minimum, include all of the following: (1) An electronic network that connects all board of elections offices with the office of the secretary of state and with the offices of all other boards of elections; (2) A computer program that harmonizes the records contained in the database with records maintained by each board of elections; (3) An interactive computer program that allows access to the records contained in the database by each board of elections and by any persons authorized by the secretary of state to add, delete, modify, or print database records, and to conduct updates of the database; (4) A search program capable of verifying registered electors and their registration information by name, driver's license or state identification card number, birth date, social security number, or current address; (5) Safeguards and components to ensure that the integrity, security, and confidentiality of the voter registration information is maintained; (6) Methods to retain canceled voter registration records for not less than five years after they are canceled and to record the reason for their cancellation. (C) For each registered elector, the statewide voter registration database shall include all of the following information: (1) The elector's name; (2) The elector's birth date; (3) The elector's current residence address; (4) The elector's precinct number; (5) The elector's Ohio driver's license or state identification card number, if available; (6) The last four digits of the elector's social security number, if available; (7) The elector's telephone number, if available; (8) The elector's electronic mail address, if available; (9)(a) The elector's voter registration date, which shall be determined based on the elector's most recent application to register to vote in this state, subject to division (C)(9)(b) of this section, as follows: (i) In the case of an application delivered in person to a state or local office of a designated agency, the office of the registrar or any deputy registrar of motor vehicles, a public high school or vocational school, a public library, or the office of a county treasurer, the date stamped on the application upon receipt by the entity that transmits the application to the board of elections or the secretary of state; (ii) In the case of an application delivered in person to a board of elections or the secretary of state, the date stamped on the application upon receipt by the board of elections or the secretary of state, as applicable; (iii) In the case of an application delivered by mail to a board of elections or the secretary of state, the date the application is postmarked; (iv) In the case of an application submitted through the online voter registration system established under section 3503.20 of the Revised Code, the date of the online submission; (v) In the case of an application submitted to a board of elections by facsimile transmission or electronic mail under Chapter 3511. of the Revised Code, the date of the receipt of the transmission or electronic mail by the board of elections; (vi) In the case of a provisional ballot affirmation that serves as an application to register to vote in future elections because the individual who cast the ballot is not registered to vote, the date the board of elections determines that the provisional ballot is invalid under section 3505.183 of the Revised Code. (b) For purposes of determining an elector's voter registration date under division (C)(9)(a) of this section, all of the following apply: (i) An elector's voter registration date shall not be during the period beginning on the day after the close of voter registration before an election and ending on the day of the election. If the date determined under division (C)(9)(a) of this section would be during that period, the voter registration date instead shall be the date on which the board of elections processes the application to register to vote after the day of the election. (ii) A change of address or change of name form, including a provisional ballot affirmation that serves as a change of address or change of name form, is not considered an application to register to vote. (iii) An application to register to vote that is submitted by an individual who is already registered to vote in this state is not considered an application to register to vote. (10) The elector's voting history, including all of the following for each election in which the elector cast a ballot that was counted: (a) The date of the election; (b) If the election was a primary election, the political party whose ballot the elector cast at the primary election or an indication that the elector voted only on the questions and issues appearing on the ballot at a special election held on the day of the primary election; (c) The type of ballot the elector cast. (11) The elector's last activity date, which shall be determined in accordance with rules adopted by the secretary of state pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (12) Any other information the secretary of state requires to be included by rule adopted pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (D) Every business day during the period beginning on the forty-sixth day before an election and ending on the eighty-first day after the day of the election, a board of elections shall create a daily record of its voter registration database as of four p.m. and shall transmit the daily record to the secretary of state in a secure manner prescribed by the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall archive the daily record and retain it for at least twenty-two months after the day of the election permanently. (E) The secretary of state shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement this section and sections 3503.151 to 3503.153 of the Revised Code, including rules doing all of the following: (1) Specifying the manner in which any voter registration records maintained by boards of elections in other data formats shall be converted for inclusion in the statewide voter registration database; (2) Establishing a uniform method for entering voter registration records into the statewide voter registration database on an expedited basis, but not less than once per day, if new registration information is received, and for transmitting information securely to the secretary of state; (3) Establishing a uniform method for purging canceled voter registration records from the statewide voter registration database in accordance with section 3503.21 of the Revised Code; (4) Specifying the persons authorized to add, delete, modify, or print records contained in the statewide voter registration database and to make updates of that database; (5) Establishing a process for annually auditing the information contained in the statewide voter registration database. (F) A board of elections promptly shall purge a voter's name and voter registration information from the statewide voter registration database in accordance with the rules adopted by the secretary of state under division (E)(3) of this section after the cancellation of a voter's registration under section 3503.21 of the Revised Code. (G) The secretary of state shall provide training in the operation of the statewide voter registration database to each board of elections and to any persons authorized by the secretary of state to add, delete, modify, or print database records, and to conduct updates of the database. (H) A board of elections and any vendor with which it contracts to provide voter registration software or related services shall ensure that the board's voter registration system and practices comply with the requirements of this section and any rules adopted under this section. Sec. 3503.153. (A) The statewide voter registration database shall be made available on a web site of the office of the secretary of state as follows: (1) Except as otherwise provided in division divisions (A)(2) and (3) of this section, the following all of the information from the statewide voter registration database regarding a registered elector shall be made available on the web site: (a) The elector's name; (b) The elector's birth date; (c) The elector's current residence address; (d) The elector's precinct number; (e) The elector's voter registration date, as described in division (C)(9) of section 3503.15 of the Revised Code; (f) The elector's voting history, as described in division (C)(10) of section 3503.15 of the Revised Code; (g) The elector's last activity date, as described in division (C)(11) of section 3503.15 of the Revised Code. (2) During the thirty days before the day of a primary or general election, the web site interface of the statewide voter registration database shall permit an elector to search for the polling location at which that elector may cast a ballot. (3) No information in the statewide voter registration database that is exempt from disclosure under division (A)(2)(B) of section 3503.13 of the Revised Code shall be made available on the web site. (4) The web site shall permit a member of the public to access the information described in division (A)(1) of this section by two methods: (a) The web site shall permit a user to download voter registration records from any given date, as provided to the secretary of state by the boards of elections under division (D) of section 3503.15 of the Revised Code, in a widely accessible electronic format. (b) The web site shall permit a user to search for an elector by name. (5) The web site also shall include contact information for each board of elections and, if an elector is required to cast a provisional ballot, the reason for that fact and instructions for the elector to provide any additional, corrected, or updated information to a board of elections that the elector must provide in order to cast a regular ballot. (B)(1) The secretary of state shall establish, by rule adopted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, a process for boards of elections to notify the secretary of state of changes in the locations of precinct polling places for the purpose of updating the information made available on the secretary of state's web site under division (A)(2) of this section. Those rules shall require a board of elections, during the thirty days before the day of a primary or general election, to notify the secretary of state within one business day of any change to the location of a precinct polling place within the county. (2) During the thirty days before the day of a primary or general election, not later than one business day after receiving a notification from a county pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section that the location of a precinct polling place has changed, the secretary of state shall update that information on the secretary of state's web site for the purpose of division (A)(2) of this section. Sec. 3503.19. (A) Persons qualified to register or to change their registration because of a change of address or change of name may register or change their registration in person at any state or local office of a designated agency, at the office of the registrar or any deputy registrar of motor vehicles, at a public high school or vocational school, at a public library, at the office of a county treasurer, or at a branch office established by the board of elections, or in person, through another person, or by mail at the office of the secretary of state or at the office of a board of elections. A registered elector may also change the elector's registration on election day at any polling place where the elector is eligible to vote, in the manner provided under section 3503.16 of the Revised Code. Any state or local office of a designated agency, a public high school or vocational school, a public library, or the office of a county treasurer shall transmit any voter registration application or change of registration form that it receives to the board of elections of the county in which the state or local office is located, within five days after receiving the voter registration application or change of registration form. The office of the registrar or any deputy registrar of motor vehicles shall transmit any electronic voter registration application or change of registration that it receives to the secretary of state within twenty-four hours after receiving it, and shall transmit any paper voter registration application or change of registration form that it receives to the board of elections of the county in which the office of the registrar or deputy registrar is located within five days after receiving the voter registration application or change of registration form, as required under section 3503.11 of the Revised Code. An otherwise valid voter registration application that is returned to the appropriate office other than by mail must be received by a state or local office of a designated agency, the office of the registrar or any deputy registrar of motor vehicles, a public high school or vocational school, a public library, the office of a county treasurer, the office of the secretary of state, or the office of a board of elections no later than the thirtieth day preceding a primary, special, or general election for the person to qualify as an elector eligible to vote at that election. An otherwise valid registration application received after that day entitles the elector to vote at all subsequent elections. Any state or local office of a designated agency, the office of the registrar or any deputy registrar of motor vehicles, a public high school or vocational school, a public library, or the office of a county treasurer shall date stamp a registration application or change of name or change of address form it receives using a date stamp that does not disclose the identity of the state or local office that receives the registration. Voter registration applications, if otherwise valid, that are returned by mail to the office of the secretary of state or to the office of a board of elections must be postmarked no later than the thirtieth day preceding a primary, special, or general election in order for the person to qualify as an elector eligible to vote at that election. If an otherwise valid voter registration application that is returned by mail does not bear a postmark or a legible postmark, the registration shall be valid for that election if received by the office of the secretary of state or the office of a board of elections no later than twenty-five days preceding any special, primary, or general election. (B)(1) Any person may apply in person, by telephone, by mail, or through another person for voter registration forms to the office of the secretary of state or the office of a board of elections. An individual who is eligible to vote as a uniformed services voter or an overseas voter in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1973ff-6 also may apply for voter registration forms by electronic means to the office of the secretary of state or to the board of elections of the county in which the person's voting residence is located pursuant to section 3503.191 of the Revised Code. (2)(a) An applicant may return the applicant's completed registration form in person or by mail to any state or local office of a designated agency, to a public high school or vocational school, to a public library, to the office of a county treasurer, to the office of the secretary of state, or to the office of a board of elections. An applicant who is eligible to vote as a uniformed services voter or an overseas voter in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1973ff-6 also may return the applicant's completed voter registration form electronically to the office of the secretary of state or to the board of elections of the county in which the person's voting residence is located pursuant to section 3503.191 of the Revised Code. (b) Subject to division (B)(2)(c) of this section, an applicant may return the applicant's completed registration form through another person to any board of elections or the office of the secretary of state. (c) A person who receives compensation for registering a voter shall return any registration form entrusted to that person by an applicant to any board of elections or to the office of the secretary of state. (d) If a board of elections or the office of the secretary of state receives a registration form under division (B)(2)(b) or (c) of this section before the thirtieth day before an election, the board or the office of the secretary of state, as applicable, shall forward the registration to the board of elections of the county in which the applicant is seeking to register to vote within ten days after receiving the application. If a board of elections or the office of the secretary of state receives a registration form under division (B)(2)(b) or (c) of this section on or after the thirtieth day before an election, the board or the office of the secretary of state, as applicable, shall forward the registration to the board of elections of the county in which the applicant is seeking to register to vote within thirty days after that election. (C)(1) A board of elections that receives a voter registration application and is satisfied as to the truth of the statements made in the registration form shall register the applicant not later than twenty business days after receiving the application, unless that application is received during the thirty days immediately preceding the day of an election. The board shall promptly notify the applicant in writing of each of the following: (a) The applicant's registration; (b) The precinct in which the applicant is to vote; (c) In bold type as follows: "Voters must bring provide photo identification to the polls in order to verify identity. Voters who do not provide photo identification will still be able to vote by casting a provisional ballot." The notification shall be by nonforwardable mail. If the mail is returned to the board, it shall investigate and cause the notification to be delivered to the correct address. (2) If, after investigating as required under division (C)(1) of this section, the board is unable to verify the voter's correct address, it shall cause the voter's name in the official registration list and in the poll list or signature pollbook to be marked to indicate that the voter's notification was returned to the board. At the first election at which a voter whose name has been so marked appears to vote, the voter shall be required to vote by provisional ballot under section 3505.181 of the Revised Code. If the provisional ballot is counted pursuant to division (B)(3) of section 3505.183 of the Revised Code, the board shall correct that voter's registration, if needed, and shall remove the indication that the voter's notification was returned from that voter's name on the official registration list and on the poll list or signature pollbook. If the provisional ballot is not counted pursuant to division (B)(4)(a)(i), (v), or (vi) of section 3505.183 of the Revised Code, the voter's registration shall be canceled. The board shall notify the voter by United States mail of the cancellation. (3) If a notice of the disposition of an otherwise valid registration application is sent by nonforwardable mail and is returned undelivered, the person shall be registered as provided in division (C)(2) of this section and sent a confirmation notice by forwardable mail. If the person fails to respond to the confirmation notice, update the person's registration, or vote by provisional ballot as provided in division (C)(2) of this section in any election during the period of two federal elections subsequent to the mailing of the confirmation notice, the person's registration shall be canceled. Sec. 3503.20. (A) The secretary of state shall establish a secure online voter registration system. The system shall provide for all of the following: (1) An applicant to submit a voter registration application to the secretary of state online through the internet; (2) The online applicant to be registered to vote, if all of the following apply: (a) The application contains all of the following information: (i) The applicant's name; (ii) The applicant's address; (iii) The applicant's date of birth; (iv) The last four digits of the applicant's social security number; (v) The applicant's Ohio driver's license number or the number of the applicant's state identification card issued under section 4507.50 of the Revised Code. (b) The applicant's name, address, and date of birth, the last four digits of the applicant's social security number, and the applicant's Ohio driver's license number or the number of the applicant's state identification card as they are provided in the application are not inconsistent with the information on file with the bureau of motor vehicles; (c) The applicant is a United States citizen, will have lived in this state for thirty days immediately preceding the next election, will be at least eighteen years of age on or before the day of the next general election, and is otherwise eligible to register to vote; (d) The applicant attests to the truth and accuracy of the information submitted in the online application under penalty of election falsification. (B) If an individual registers to vote or a registered elector updates the elector's name, address, or both under this section, the secretary of state shall obtain an electronic copy of the applicant's or elector's signature that is on file with the bureau of motor vehicles. That electronic signature shall be used as the applicant's or elector's signature on voter registration records, for all election and signature-matching purposes. (C) (C)(1) The secretary of state shall employ whatever security measures the secretary of state considers necessary to ensure the integrity and accuracy of voter registration information submitted electronically pursuant to this section. Errors Before an applicant may submit a voter registration application or update, the online voter registration system shall require the applicant to verify the applicant's identity. When accessing the online voter registration system using a secure online account registered to the person the applicant purports to be, the applicant shall complete multifactor authentication each time the applicant uses the account, using one or more of the following methods: (a) Entering a code sent to an electronic mail address or telephone number that, according to the previously existing records of the secretary of state or another state agency, belongs to the person the applicant purports to be; (b) Providing a token from authentication software installed on a device that, according to the previously existing records of the secretary of state or another state agency, belongs to the person the applicant purports to be; (c) Answering one or more questions about the person the applicant purports to be, based on information about the person in the previously existing records of the secretary of state or another state agency that is not available to the public. (2) As used in division (C)(1) of this section, "multifactor authentication" has the same meaning as in section 3965.01 of the Revised Code. (3) Errors in processing voter registration applications in the online system shall not prevent an applicant from becoming registered or from voting. (D) The online voter registration application established under division (A) of this section shall include the following language: "By clicking the box below, I affirm all of the following under penalty of election falsification, which is a felony of the fifth degree: (1) I am the person whose name and identifying information is provided on this form, and I desire to register to vote, or update my voter registration, in the State of Ohio. (2) All of the information I have provided on this form is true and correct as of the date I am submitting this form. (3) I am a United States citizen. (4) I will have lived in Ohio for thirty days immediately preceding the next election. (5) I will be at least eighteen years of age on or before the day of the next general election. (6) I authorize the Bureau of Motor Vehicles to transmit to the Ohio Secretary of State my signature that is on file with the Bureau of Motor Vehicles, and I understand and agree that the signature transmitted by the Bureau of Motor Vehicles will be used by the Secretary of State to validate this electronic voter registration application as if I had signed this form personally." In order to register to vote or update a voter registration under division (A) of this section, an applicant or elector shall be required to mark the box in the online voter registration application that appears in conjunction with the previous statement. (E) The online voter registration process established under division (A) of this section shall be in operation and available for use by individuals who wish to register to vote or update their voter registration information online not earlier than January 1, 2017. During the period beginning on the first day after the close of voter registration before an election and ending on the day of the election, the online voter registration system shall display a notice indicating that the applicant will not be registered to vote for the purposes of that election. (F) Notwithstanding section 1.50 of the Revised Code, if any provision of this section or of division (E) of section 3503.14 of the Revised Code is held invalid, or if the application of any provision of this section or of that division to any person or circumstance is held invalid, then this section and that division cease to operate. Sec. 3503.28. (A) The secretary of state shall develop an information brochure regarding voter registration and identification. The brochure shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following information: (1) The applicable deadlines for registering to vote or for returning an applicant's completed registration form; (2) The applicable deadline for returning an applicant's completed registration form if the person returning the form is being compensated for registering voters; (3) The locations to which a person may return an applicant's completed registration form; (4) The location to which a person who is compensated for registering voters may return an applicant's completed registration form; (5) The registration and affirmation requirements applicable to persons who are compensated for registering voters under section 3503.29 of the Revised Code; (6) A notice, which shall be written in bold type, stating as follows: "Voters must bring provide photo identification to the polls in order to verify identity. Voters who do not provide photo identification will still be able to vote by casting a provisional ballot." (7) The acceptable types of photo identification; (8) The requirement to include a copy of the voter's photo identification when casting absent voter's ballots by mail; (9) The manner in which an elector may receive a state identification card without the payment of any fee; (10) The manner in which an elector may receive a copy of the elector's photo identification without the payment of any fee, as described in section 3509.11 of the Revised Code. (B) Except as otherwise provided in division (D) of this section, a A board of elections, designated agency, public high school, public vocational school, public library, office of a county treasurer, or deputy registrar of motor vehicles shall distribute offer a copy of the brochure developed under division (A) of this section to any person who requests more than two a voter registration forms at one time form or otherwise registers to vote through the office. (C)(1) The secretary of state shall provide the information required to be included in the brochure developed under division (A) of this section to any person who prints a voter registration form that is made available on a web site of the office of the secretary of state and to any person who registers to vote or updates the person's registration through the online voter registration system described in section 3503.20 of the Revised Code. (2) If a board of elections operates and maintains a web site, the board shall provide the information required to be included in the brochure developed under division (A) of this section to any person who prints a voter registration form that is made available on that web site. (D) A board of elections shall not be required to distribute a copy of a brochure under division (B) of this section to any of the following officials or employees who are requesting more than two voter registration forms at one time in the course of the official's or employee's normal duties: (1) An election official; (2) A county treasurer; (3) A deputy registrar of motor vehicles; (4) An employee of a designated agency; (5) An employee of a public high school; (6) An employee of a public vocational school; (7) An employee of a public library; (8) An employee of the office of a county treasurer; (9) An employee of the bureau of motor vehicles; (10) An employee of a deputy registrar of motor vehicles; (11) An employee of an election official. (E) As used in this section, "registering voters" includes any effort, for compensation, to provide voter registration forms or to assist persons in completing or returning those forms. Sec. 3505.19. (A) An elector who does not have photo identification because the elector has a religious objection to being photographed may complete an affidavit of religious objection in lieu of providing photo identification for the purpose of casting a provisional ballot or casting absent voter's ballots by mail. (B) The secretary of state shall prescribe the form of the affidavit of religious objection, which shall be substantially as follows: "Affidavit of Religious Objection I, _______________________ (first and last name of elector), declare under penalty of election falsification that I do not have photo identification because I have a sincere religious objection to being photographed. The last four digits of my Social Security number are: ______ ________________________ (Signature of individual) WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." (C) Upon receiving a completed affidavit of religious objection, the board of elections shall transmit the information in the affidavit to the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall consult the database of the bureau of motor vehicles to determine whether the registrar of motor vehicles or a deputy registrar has issued a currently unexpired photo identification to the elector and shall notify the board of the result. (D) An affidavit of religious objection is not valid if either of the following apply: (1) The last four digits of the elector's social security number, as provided on the affidavit, are different from the last four digits of the elector's social security number in the statewide voter registration database. (2) The registrar of motor vehicles or a deputy registrar has issued a currently unexpired photo identification to the elector. Sec. 3509.04. (A) If a board of elections receives an application for absent voter's ballots that does not contain all of the required information or is not submitted on an appropriate form, the board promptly shall notify the applicant of the additional information required to be provided by the applicant to complete that application, direct the applicant to use an appropriate form, or both, as applicable. (B) Upon receipt by the board of elections of an application for absent voter's ballots that contains all of the required information and is submitted on an appropriate form, as provided by section 3509.03 and division (G) of section 3503.16 of the Revised Code, the board, if the board finds that the applicant is a qualified elector, shall deliver to the applicant in person or mail directly to the applicant by special delivery mail, air mail, or regular mail, postage prepaid, proper absent voter's ballots. The board shall deliver or mail with the ballots an unsealed identification envelope upon the face of which shall be printed a form substantially as follows: "Identification Envelope Statement of Voter I, ________________________(Name of voter as it appears on the voter's Ohio driver's license or state identification card or, if the voter does not have one, on the voter's social security card), declare under penalty of election falsification that the within ballot or ballots contained no voting marks of any kind when I received them, and I caused the ballot or ballots to be marked, enclosed in the identification envelope, and sealed in that envelope. My voting residence in Ohio is ________________________________________________________________ (Street and Number, if any, or Rural Route and Number) of ________________________________ (City, Village, or Township) Ohio, which is in Ward _____________ Precinct ________________ in that city, village, or township. If I have a confidential voter registration record, I am providing my program participant identification number instead of my residence address: ________________________ The primary election ballots, if any, within this envelope are primary election ballots of the _____________ Party. Ballots contained within this envelope are to be voted at the __________ (general, special, or primary) election to be held on the __________________________ day of ______________________, ____. My date of birth is _______________ (Month and Day), __________ (Year). (Voter must provide one of the following:) My Ohio driver's license or state identification card number is _______________ (Driver's license or state identification card number). I do not have an Ohio driver's license or state identification card. The last four digits of my Social Security Number are _______________ (Last four digits of Social Security Number). (Voter must provide one of the following:) ______ In lieu of providing a driver's license or state identification card number or the last four digits of my Social Security Number, I am enclosing a legible paper copy of the front and back of my photo identification in the return envelope in which this identification envelope will be mailed. Acceptable photo identification is an Ohio driver's license, state identification card, or interim identification form issued by the Bureau of Motor Vehicles, a United States passport or passport card, a United States military identification card, an Ohio National Guard identification card, or a United States Department of Veterans Affairs identification card. Your photo identification must include your name and photograph and must not be expired. ENCLOSE A COPY OF YOUR PHOTO ID, NOT THE ORIGINAL PHOTO ID ______ I am enclosing a completed affidavit of religious objection to being photographed in the return envelope in which this identification envelope will be mailed. I hereby declare, under penalty of election falsification, that the statements above are true, as I verily believe. _________________________ (Signature of Voter) WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." The board shall mail with the ballots and the unsealed identification envelope an unsealed return envelope upon the face of which shall be printed the post-office address of the board. In the upper left corner on the face of the return envelope, several blank lines shall be printed upon which the voter may write the voter's name and return address. The return envelope shall be of such size that the identification envelope can be conveniently placed within it for returning the identification envelope to the board. No public office, and no public official or employee who is acting in an official capacity, shall prepay the return postage for any absent voter's ballots. Except as otherwise provided in this section and in sections 3505.24 and 3509.08 of the Revised Code, an election official shall not fill out any portion of an identification envelope statement of voter or an absent voter's ballot on behalf of an elector. A board of elections may preprint only an elector's name and address on an identification envelope statement of voter before mailing absent voter's ballots to the elector, except that if the elector has a confidential voter registration record, as described in section 111.44 of the Revised Code, the board of elections shall not preprint the elector's address on the identification envelope statement of voter. Sec. 3509.05. (A) When an elector receives an absent voter's ballot pursuant to the elector's application or request, the elector shall, before placing any marks on the ballot, note whether there are any voting marks on it. If there are any voting marks, the ballot shall be returned immediately to the board of elections; otherwise, the elector shall cause the ballot to be marked, folded in a manner that the stub on it and the indorsements and facsimile signatures of the members of the board of elections on the back of it are visible, and placed and sealed within the identification envelope received from the board of elections for that purpose. Then, the elector shall cause the statement of voter on the outside of the identification envelope to be completed and signed, under penalty of election falsification. (B)(B)(1) The elector shall provide one of the following: (1) (a) The elector's Ohio driver's license or state identification card number on the statement of voter on the identification envelope; (2) (b) The last four digits of the elector's social security number on the statement of voter on the identification envelope; (3) A copy of the elector's photo identification in the return envelope with the identification envelope. (2) The elector shall enclose one of the following in the return envelope with the identification envelope: (a) A copy of the elector's photo identification; (b) A completed affidavit of religious objection to being photographed, as described in section 3505.19 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) The elector shall mail the identification envelope to the office of the board of elections in the return envelope, postage prepaid, or the elector may personally deliver it to the office of the board, or the spouse of the elector, the father, mother, father-in-law, mother-in-law, grandfather, grandmother, brother, or sister of the whole or half blood, or the son, daughter, adopting parent, adopted child, stepparent, stepchild, uncle, aunt, nephew, or niece of the elector may deliver it to the office of the board. The return envelope shall be returned by no other person, in no other manner, and to no other location, except as otherwise provided in section 3509.08 of the Revised Code. (2) If the board maintains multiple offices in the county, as permitted under division (C) of section 3501.10 of the Revised Code, the board may designate any of its offices for the return of absent voter's ballots under this section, provided that the board shall designate only one office to which absent voter's ballots shall be returned under this section. (3)(a) The board of elections may place not more than one secure receptacle outside the office of the board, on the property on which the office of the board is located, for the purpose of receiving absent voter's ballots under this section. (b) A secure receptacle shall be open to receive ballots only during the period beginning on the first day after the close of voter registration before the election and ending at seven-thirty p.m. on the day of the election. The receptacle shall be open to receive ballots at all times during that period. (c) A secure receptacle shall be monitored by recorded video surveillance at all times. The video recordings are a public record. The board shall do one of the following: (i) Make the video recordings available for inspection upon request in accordance with section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (ii) Make each day's video recording available to the public on the internet for streaming or download without charge within seventy-two hours after the recording ends and make the video recordings available to the public upon request in accordance with section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (d) Only a bipartisan team of election officials may open a secure receptacle or handle its contents. A bipartisan team of election officials shall collect the contents of each secure receptacle and deliver them to the board for processing at least once each day and at seven-thirty p.m. on the day of the election. If, at seven-thirty p.m. on the day of the election, there are persons waiting in line to deposit absent voter's ballots in a receptacle, those persons shall be permitted to deposit the ballots. (4)(a) During the period beginning on the forty-fifth day before election day and ending on the day after election day, on each day the office of the board of elections is open for business, the board shall report to the secretary of state all of the following information concerning the previous business day: (i) The number of return envelopes purporting to contain absent voter's ballots or uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballots the board received by personal delivery, other than to a receptacle described in division (C)(3) of this section; (ii) If the board has placed a secure receptacle outside the office of the board under division (C)(3) of this section, the number of return envelopes purporting to contain absent voter's ballots or uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballots the board received in the receptacle. (b) As soon as practicable after receiving a report under division (C)(4)(a) of this section, the secretary of state shall make the information in the report available to the public on the secretary of state's official web site. (D)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(2) of this section, all envelopes containing marked absent voter's ballots shall be delivered to the office of the board not later than the close of the polls on the day of an election. Absent voter's ballots delivered to the office of the board later than the times specified shall not be counted, but shall be kept by the board in the sealed identification envelopes in which they are delivered, until the time provided by section 3505.31 of the Revised Code for the destruction of all other ballots used at the election for which ballots were provided, at which time they shall be destroyed. (2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(2)(b) of this section, any return envelope that is postmarked prior to the day of the election shall be delivered to the director prior to the fifth day after the election. Ballots delivered in envelopes postmarked prior to the day of the election that are received after the close of the polls on election day through the fourth day thereafter shall be counted on the fifth day at the board of elections in the manner provided in divisions (C) and (D) of section 3509.06 of the Revised Code or in the manner provided in division (E) of that section, as applicable. Any such ballots that are received by the director later than the fourth day following the election shall not be counted, but shall be kept by the board in the sealed identification envelopes as provided in division (A) of this section. (b) Division (D)(2)(a) of this section shall not apply to any mail that is postmarked using a postage evidencing system, including a postage meter, as defined in 39 C.F.R. 501.1. Sec. 3509.06. (A) The board of elections shall determine whether absent voter's ballots cast under section 3503.16, 3509.05, 3509.08, or 3511.09 of the Revised Code shall be processed and counted in each precinct, at the office of the board, or at some other location designated by the board, and shall proceed accordingly under division (B), (C), or (E) of this section, as applicable. (B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(2) of this section, when the board of elections determines that those absent voter's ballots shall be processed and counted in each precinct, the board shall deliver to the voting location manager of each precinct on election day identification envelopes purporting to contain absent voter's ballots of electors whose voting residence appears from the statement of voter on the outside of each of those envelopes, to be located in that manager's precinct, and which were received by the board not later than the close of the polls on election day. The board shall deliver to the voting location manager a list containing the name and voting residence of each person whose voting residence is in such precinct to whom absent voter's ballots were mailed. (2) The board shall not deliver to the voting location manager identification envelopes cast by electors who provided a program participant identification number instead of a residence address on the identification envelope and shall not inform the voting location manager of the names and voting residences of persons who have confidential voter registration records. Those identification envelopes shall be examined and processed as described in division (E) of this section. (C) When the board of elections determines that those absent voter's ballots shall be processed and counted at the office of the board of elections or at another location designated by the board, special election officials shall be appointed by the board for that purpose having the same authority as is exercised by precinct election officials. The votes so cast shall be added to the vote totals by the board, and the absent voter's ballots shall be preserved separately by the board, in the same manner and for the same length of time as provided by section 3505.31 of the Revised Code. (D) Each of the identification envelopes purporting to contain absent voter's ballots delivered to the voting location manager of the precinct or the special election official appointed by the board of elections shall be handled as follows: (1) The election officials shall compare the signature of the elector on the outside of the identification envelope with the signature of that elector on the elector's registration form and verify that the absent voter's ballot is eligible to be counted under section 3509.07 of the Revised Code. (2)(a) Any of the precinct officials may challenge the right of the elector named on the identification envelope to vote the absent voter's ballots upon the ground that the signature on the envelope is not the same as the signature on the registration form, that the identification envelope statement of voter is incomplete, that the ballots are invalid under section 3509.07 of the Revised Code, or upon any other of the grounds upon which the right of persons to vote may be lawfully challenged. (b) If the elector's name does not appear in the pollbook or poll list or signature pollbook, the precinct officials shall deliver the absent voter's ballots to the director of the board of elections to be examined and processed in the manner described in division (E) of this section. (3)(a) An identification envelope statement of voter shall be considered incomplete if it does not include all of the following: (i) The voter's name; as it appears on the voter's Ohio driver's license or state identification card or, if the voter does not have an Ohio driver's license or state identification card, as it appears on the voter's social security card. The voter's name is considered complete if all of the following conditions are met: (I) Any difference in the first or middle name is due to the use of a formal, informal, or commonly recognized nickname version of the same name, whether on the identification envelope statement of voter or in the records of the bureau of motor vehicles or the social security administration. (II) The middle name and middle initial begin with the same letter. (III) The last name on the identification envelope statement of voter exactly matches the last name in the records of the bureau of motor vehicles or the social security administration. (ii) The voter's residence address or, if the voter has a confidential voter registration record, as described in section 111.44 of the Revised Code, the voter's program participant identification number; (iii) The voter's date of birth. The requirements of this division are satisfied if the voter provided a date of birth and any of the following is true: (I) The month and day of the voter's date of birth on the identification envelope statement of voter are not different from the month and day of the voter's date of birth contained in the statewide voter registration database. (II) The voter's date of birth contained in the statewide voter registration database is January 1, 1800. (III) The board of elections has found, by a vote of at least three of its members, that the voter has met the requirements of divisions (D)(3)(a)(i), (ii), (iv), and (v) of this section. (iv) The voter's signature; and (v) One of the following forms of identification: (I) The voter's Ohio driver's license or state identification card number; (II) The if the voter has one, or if the voter does not have an Ohio driver's license or state identification card, the last four digits of the voter's social security number; or (III) (vi) A copy of the voter's photo identification or a valid affidavit of religious objection to being photographed, as described in section 3505.19 of the Revised Code. (b) If the election officials find that a copy of the voter's photo identification or a valid affidavit of religious objection to being photographed is not enclosed, that the identification envelope statement of voter is incomplete, or that the information contained in that statement does not conform to the enclosed copy of the voter's photo identification or the affidavit of religious objection to being photographed or to the information contained in the statewide voter registration database concerning the voter, the election officials shall mail a written notice to the voter, informing the voter of the nature of the defect. The notice shall inform the voter that in order for the voter's ballot to be counted, the voter must provide the necessary information, identification, or affidavit to the board of elections in writing and on a form prescribed by the secretary of state not later than the fourth day after the day of the election. The voter shall provide any necessary information in writing and on a form prescribed by the secretary of state. The voter may deliver the form, identification, or affidavit to the office of the board in person or by mail. If the voter provides the necessary information, identification, or affidavit to the board of elections not later than the fourth day after the day of the election and the ballot is not successfully challenged on another basis, the voter's ballot shall be processed and counted in accordance with this section. (4) If no such challenge is made, or if such a challenge is made and not sustained, the voting location manager shall open the envelope without defacing the statement of voter and without mutilating the ballots in it, and shall remove the ballots contained in it and proceed to count them. (5)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(5)(b) of this section, the name of each person voting who is entitled to vote only an absent voter's presidential ballot shall be entered in a pollbook or poll list or signature pollbook followed by the words "Absentee Presidential Ballot." The name of each person voting an absent voter's ballot, other than such persons entitled to vote only a presidential ballot, shall be entered in the pollbook or poll list or signature pollbook and the person's registration card marked to indicate that the person has voted. (b) If the person voting has a confidential voter registration record, the person's registration card shall be marked to indicate that the person has voted, but the person's name shall not be entered in the pollbook or poll list or signature pollbook. (6) The date of such election shall also be entered on the elector's registration form. If any such challenge is made and sustained, the identification envelope of such elector shall not be opened, shall be endorsed "Not Counted" with the reasons the ballots were not counted, and shall be delivered to the board. (E)(1) When the board of elections receives absent voter's ballots from an elector who has provided a program participant identification number instead of a residence address on the identification envelope statement of voter, the director and the deputy director personally shall examine and process the identification envelope statement of voter in the manner prescribed in division (D) of this section. (2) If the director and the deputy director find that the identification envelope statement of voter is incomplete or that the information contained in that statement does not conform to the information contained in the statewide voter registration database concerning the voter or to the information contained in the voter's confidential voter registration record, the director and the deputy director shall mail a written notice to the voter informing the voter of the nature of the defect. The notice shall inform the voter that in order for the voter's ballot to be counted the voter must provide the necessary information, identification, or affidavit to the board of elections in writing and on a form prescribed by the secretary of state not later than the fourth day after the day of the election. The voter shall provide any necessary information in writing and on a form prescribed by the secretary of state. The voter may deliver the form, identification, or affidavit to the office of the board in person or by mail. If the voter provides the necessary information, identification, or affidavit to the board of elections not later than the fourth day after the day of the election and the ballot is not successfully challenged on another basis, the voter's ballot shall be counted in accordance with this section. (3) The director or the deputy director may challenge the ballot on the ground that the signature on the envelope is not the same as the signature on the registration form, that the identification envelope statement of voter is incomplete, or upon any other of the grounds upon which the right of persons to vote may be lawfully challenged. If such a challenge is made, the board of elections shall decide whether to sustain the challenge. (4) If neither the director nor the deputy director challenges the ballot, or if such a challenge is made and not sustained, the director and the deputy director shall open the envelope without defacing the statement of voter and without mutilating the ballots in it, shall remove the ballots contained in it, and shall transmit the ballots to the election officials to be counted with other absent voter's ballots from that precinct. (F) The board of elections shall process absent voter's ballots before the time for counting those ballots, but the board shall not tabulate or count the votes on those ballots before that time. As used in this section and section 3511.11 of the Revised Code, processing an absent voter's ballot means all of the following: (1) Examining the identification envelope statement of voter in order to verify that the absent voter's ballot is eligible to be counted under section 3509.07 of the Revised Code; (2) Opening the identification envelope, if the absent voter's ballot is eligible to be counted; (3) Determining the validity of the absent voter's ballot under section 3509.07 of the Revised Code; (4) Preparing and sorting the absent voter's ballot for scanning by automatic tabulating equipment; (5) Scanning the absent voter's ballot by automatic tabulating equipment, if the equipment used by the board of elections permits an absent voter's ballot to be scanned without tabulating or counting the votes on the ballots scanned. (G) Special election officials, employees or members of the board of elections, or observers shall not disclose the count or any portion of the count of absent voter's ballots prior to the time of the closing of the polling places. No person shall recklessly disclose the count or any portion of the count of absent voter's ballots in such a manner as to jeopardize the secrecy of any individual ballot. (H)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (H)(2) of this section, observers may be appointed under section 3505.21 of the Revised Code to witness the examination and opening of identification envelopes and the processing and counting of absent voters' ballots under this section. (2) Observers shall not be permitted to witness the examination and opening of identification envelopes returned by, and the processing and counting of absent voter's ballots cast by, electors who have confidential voter registration records in a manner that would permit the observers to learn the identities or residence addresses of those electors. Sec. 3509.07. If election officials find that any of the following are true concerning an absent voter's ballot or absent voter's presidential ballot cast under section 3503.16, 3509.05, 3509.08, or 3511.09 of the Revised Code and, if applicable, the person did not provide any required additional information, identification, or affidavit to the board of elections not later than the fourth day after the day of the election, as permitted under division (D)(3)(b) or (E)(2) of section 3509.06 of the Revised Code, the ballot shall not be accepted or counted: (A) The statement accompanying the ballot is incomplete as described in division (D)(3)(a) of section 3509.06 of the Revised Code or is insufficient; (B) The signatures do not correspond with the person's registration signature; (C) The applicant is not a qualified elector in the precinct; (D) The ballot envelope contains more than one ballot of any one kind, or any voted ballot that the elector is not entitled to vote; (E) Stub A is detached from the absent voter's ballot or absent voter's presidential ballot; or (F) The elector has not included with the elector's ballot any the identification required under section 3509.05 or 3511.09 of the Revised Code. The vote of any absent voter may be challenged for cause in the same manner as other votes are challenged, and the election officials shall determine the legality of that ballot. Every ballot not counted shall be endorsed on its back "Not Counted" with the reasons the ballot was not counted, and shall be enclosed and returned to or retained by the board of elections along with the contested ballots. Sec. 3509.08. (A) Any qualified elector, who, on account of the elector's own personal illness, physical disability, or infirmity, or on account of the elector's confinement in a jail or workhouse under sentence for a misdemeanor or awaiting trial on a felony or misdemeanor, will be unable to travel from the elector's home or place of confinement to the voting booth in the elector's precinct on the day of any general, special, or primary election may make application in writing for an absent voter's ballot to the board of elections of the elector's county in the manner described in section 3509.03 of the Revised Code. The application shall state the nature of the elector's illness, physical disability, or infirmity, or the fact that the elector is confined in a jail or workhouse and the elector's resultant inability to travel to the election booth in the elector's precinct on election day. The absent voter's ballot may be mailed directly to the applicant at the applicant's voting residence or place of confinement as stated in the applicant's application, or the board may designate two board employees belonging to the two major political parties for the purpose of delivering the ballot to the disabled or confined elector and returning it to the board, unless the applicant is confined to a public or private institution within the county, in which case the board shall designate two board employees belonging to the two major political parties for the purpose of delivering the ballot to the disabled or confined elector and returning it to the board. In all other instances, the ballot shall be returned to the office of the board in the manner prescribed in section 3509.05 of the Revised Code. Any disabled or confined elector who declares to the two board employees belonging to the two major political parties that the elector is unable to mark the elector's ballot by reason of physical infirmity that is apparent to the employees to be sufficient to incapacitate the voter from marking the elector's ballot properly, may receive, upon request, the assistance of the employees in marking the elector's ballot, and they shall thereafter give no information in regard to this matter. Such assistance shall not be rendered for any other cause. When two board employees belonging to the two major political parties deliver a ballot to a disabled or confined elector, each of the employees shall be present when the ballot is delivered, when assistance is given, and when the ballot is returned to the office of the board, and shall subscribe to the declaration on the identification envelope. The secretary of state shall prescribe the form of application for absent voter's ballots under this division. This chapter applies to disabled and confined absent voter's ballots except as otherwise provided in this section. (B)(1) Any qualified elector who is unable to travel to the voting booth in the elector's precinct on the day of any general, special, or primary election may apply to the board of elections of the county where the elector is a qualified elector to vote in the election by absent voter's ballot if either of the following apply: (a) The elector is confined in a hospital as a result of an accident or unforeseeable medical emergency occurring before the election; (b) The elector's minor child is confined in a hospital as a result of an accident or unforeseeable medical emergency occurring before the election. (2) The application authorized under division (B)(1) of this section shall be made in writing in the manner described in section 3509.03 of the Revised Code, except that the application shall be delivered to the office of the board not later than three p.m. on the day of the election. The application shall indicate the hospital where the applicant or the applicant's child is confined, the date of the applicant's or the applicant's child's admission to the hospital, and the offices for which the applicant is qualified to vote. The applicant may also request that a member of the applicant's family, as listed in section 3509.05 of the Revised Code, deliver the absent voter's ballot to the applicant. The board, after establishing to the board's satisfaction the validity of the circumstances claimed by the applicant, shall supply an absent voter's ballot to be delivered to the applicant. When the applicant or the applicant's child is in a hospital in the county where the applicant is a qualified elector and no request is made for a member of the family to deliver the ballot, the board shall arrange for the delivery of an absent voter's ballot to the applicant, and for its return to the office of the board, by two board employees belonging to the two major political parties according to the procedures prescribed in division (A) of this section. When the applicant or the applicant's child is in a hospital outside the county where the applicant is a qualified elector and no request is made for a member of the family to deliver the ballot, the board shall arrange for the delivery of an absent voter's ballot to the applicant by mail, and the ballot shall be returned to the office of the board in the manner prescribed in section 3509.05 of the Revised Code. (3) Any qualified elector who is eligible to vote under division (B) or (C) of section 3503.16 of the Revised Code but is unable to do so because of the circumstances described in division (B)(2) of this section may vote in accordance with division (B)(1) of this section if that qualified elector states in the application for absent voter's ballots that that qualified elector moved or had a change of name under the circumstances described in division (B) or (C) of section 3503.16 of the Revised Code and if that qualified elector complies with divisions (G)(1) to (4) of section 3503.16 of the Revised Code. (C) Any qualified elector described in division (A) or (B)(1) of this section who needs no assistance to vote or to return absent voter's ballots to the board of elections may apply for absent voter's ballots under section 3509.03 of the Revised Code instead of applying for them under this section or may cast absent voter's ballots in person under section 3509.051 of the Revised Code. (D) Any qualified elector described in division (A) or (B)(1) of this section to whom ballots are delivered by two employees of the board of elections or who votes with the assistance of two employees of the board of elections shall be considered to have cast absent voter's ballots by mail, rather than in person, for the purpose of the laws governing voter identification. The board of elections shall provide its employees who deliver ballots to electors under this section with appropriate equipment to provide to an elector, without charge, a copy of the elector's photo identification for the purpose of casting absent voter's ballots under this section. Sec. 3509.11. Upon request made in person by an elector, all of the following shall provide to the elector, without charge, a copy of the elector's photo identification for the purpose of casting absent voter's ballots by mail: (A) The secretary of state; (B) A board of elections; (C) The registrar of motor vehicles or a deputy registrar; (D) A designated agency; (E) A public high school or vocational school; (F) A public library; (G) A county treasurer. Sec. 3511.05. (A) The board of elections shall place uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballots sent by mail in an unsealed identification envelope, gummed ready for sealing. The board shall include with uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballots sent electronically, including by facsimile machine, an instruction sheet for preparing a gummed envelope in which the ballots shall be returned. The envelope for returning ballots sent by either means shall have printed or written on its face a form substantially as follows: "Identification Envelope Statement of Voter I, ________________________(Name of voter as it appears on the voter's Ohio driver's license or state identification card or, if the voter does not have one, on the voter's social security card), declare under penalty of election falsification that the within ballot or ballots contained no voting marks of any kind when I received them, and I caused the ballot or ballots to be marked, enclosed in the identification envelope, and sealed in that envelope. My voting residence in Ohio is ________________________________________________________________ (Street and Number, if any, or Rural Route and Number) of ________________________________ (City, Village, or Township) Ohio, which is in Ward _______________ Precinct ________________ in that city, village, or township. If I have a confidential voter registration record, I am providing my program participant identification number instead of my residence address: ________________________ The primary election ballots, if any, within this envelope are primary election ballots of the _____________ Party. Ballots contained within this envelope are to be voted at the __________ (general, special, or primary) election to be held on the __________________________ day of ______________________, ____ My date of birth is _______________ (Month and Day), __________ (Year). (Voter must provide one of the following:) My Ohio driver's license or state identification card number is _______________ (Driver's license or state identification card number). I do not have an Ohio driver's license or state identification card. The last four digits of my Social Security Number are _______________ (Last four digits of Social Security Number). (Voter must provide one of the following:) ______ In lieu of providing a driver's license or state identification card number or the last four digits of my Social Security Number, I am enclosing a legible paper copy of the front and back of my photo identification in the return envelope in which this identification envelope will be mailed. Acceptable photo identification is an Ohio driver's license, state identification card, or interim identification form issued by the Bureau of Motor Vehicles, a United States passport or passport card, a United States military identification card, an Ohio National Guard identification card, or a United States Department of Veterans Affairs identification card. Your photo identification must include your name and photograph and must not be expired. ENCLOSE A COPY OF YOUR PHOTO ID, NOT THE ORIGINAL PHOTO ID ______ I am enclosing a completed affidavit of religious objection to being photographed in the return envelope in which this identification envelope will be mailed. I hereby declare, under penalty of election falsification, that the statements above are true, as I verily believe. ________________________ (Signature of Voter) WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." (B) The board shall also mail with the ballots and the unsealed identification envelope sent by mail an unsealed return envelope, gummed, ready for sealing, for use by the voter in returning the voter's marked ballots to the office of the board. The board shall send with the ballots and the instruction sheet for preparing a gummed envelope sent electronically, including by facsimile machine, an instruction sheet for preparing a second gummed envelope as described in this division, for use by the voter in returning that voter's marked ballots to the board. The return envelope shall have two parallel lines, each one quarter of an inch in width, printed across its face paralleling the top, with an intervening space of one quarter of an inch between such lines. The top line shall be one and one-quarter inches from the top of the envelope. Between the parallel lines shall be printed: "OFFICIAL ELECTION UNIFORMED SERVICES OR OVERSEAS ABSENT VOTER'S BALLOTS -- VIA AIR MAIL." Three blank lines shall be printed in the upper left corner on the face of the envelope for the use by the voter in placing the voter's complete military, naval, or mailing address on these lines. The post-office address of the office of the board shall be printed on the face of such envelope in the lower right portion below the bottom parallel line. (C) On the back of each identification envelope and each return envelope shall be printed the following: "Instructions to voter: If the flap on this envelope is so firmly stuck to the back of the envelope when received by you as to require forcible opening in order to use it, open the envelope in the manner least injurious to it, and, after marking your ballots and enclosing same in the envelope for mailing them to the board of elections, reclose the envelope in the most practicable way, by sealing or otherwise, and sign the blank form printed below. The flap on this envelope was firmly stuck to the back of the envelope when received, and required forced opening before sealing and mailing. ____________________ (Signature of voter)" (D) Division (C) of this section does not apply when absent voter's ballots are sent electronically, including by facsimile machine. (E) Except as otherwise provided in this division and in sections 3505.24 and 3509.08 of the Revised Code, an election official shall not fill out any portion of an identification envelope statement of voter or an absent voter's ballot on behalf of an elector. A board of elections may preprint only an elector's name and address on an identification envelope statement of voter before mailing or electronically transmitting absent voter's ballots to the elector, except that if the elector has a confidential voter registration record, as described in section 111.44 of the Revised Code, the board of elections shall not preprint the elector's address on the identification envelope statement of voter. Sec. 3511.09. (A) Upon receiving uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballots, the elector shall cause the questions on the face of the identification envelope to be answered, and, by writing the elector's usual signature in the proper place on the identification envelope, the elector shall declare under penalty of election falsification that the answers to those questions are true and correct to the best of the elector's knowledge and belief. Then, the elector shall note whether there are any voting marks on the ballot. If there are any voting marks, the ballot shall be returned immediately to the board of elections; otherwise, the elector shall cause the ballot to be marked, folded separately so as to conceal the markings on it, deposited in the identification envelope, and securely sealed in the identification envelope. The elector shall sign the identification envelope not later than the close of the polls on the day of the election. The elector then shall cause the identification envelope to be placed within the return envelope, sealed in the return envelope, and mailed to the board of elections to which it is addressed. (B)(B)(1) The elector shall provide one of the following: (1) (a) The elector's Ohio driver's license or state identification card number on the statement of voter on the identification envelope; (2) (b) The last four digits of the elector's social security number on the statement of voter on the identification envelope; (3) A copy of the elector's photo identification in the return envelope with the identification envelope. (2) The elector shall enclose one of the following in the return envelope with the identification envelope: (a) A copy of the elector's photo identification; (b) A completed affidavit of religious objection to being photographed, as described in section 3505.19 of the Revised Code. (C) Every uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballot identification envelope shall be accompanied by the following statement in boldface capital letters: WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE. (D) The elector shall cause the uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballots to be returned to the office of the board of elections in a manner described in division (C) of section 3509.05 of the Revised Code, provided that the elector shall not be required to prepay the postage on the return envelope if, under 39 U.S.C. 3406, no postage is required. Sec. 4501.023. (A) The registrar of motor vehicles shall designate an employee of the bureau of motor vehicles to be in charge of and responsible for voter registration within the bureau. Each deputy registrar of motor vehicles shall designate an employee in that deputy registrar's office to be in charge of and responsible for voter registration within that office. (B) The registrar shall provide, in cooperation with the secretary of state, a training program and materials for initial training in voter registration and for ongoing training for all deputy registrars and their employees. (C) The registrar shall report to the secretary of state at least once annually the number of applicants for licenses served and the number of voter registration transactions completed and transmitted to the board of elections by the registrar and all deputy registrars. (D) The registrar shall manage a homebound identification program in order to provide an identification card to an individual who is unable to travel to a deputy registrar office because of confinement, a medical condition, or a disability. Through the program, a homebound individual may request that a representative of the department of public safety come to the individual's residence in order to verify the individual's identity and issue a physical identification card. Additionally, through the program, a homebound individual may request a copy of the individual's identification card without charge, in accordance with section 3509.11 of the Revised Code, in order to provide the required photo identification for the purpose of casting an absent voter's ballot by mail. Sec. 4507.01. (A) As used in this chapter, "motor vehicle," "motorized bicycle," "state," "owner," "operator," "chauffeur," and "highways" have the same meanings as in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code. "Driver's license" means a class D license issued to any person to operate a motor vehicle or motor-driven cycle, other than a commercial motor vehicle, and includes "probationary license," "restricted license," "limited term license," and any operator's or chauffeur's license issued before January 1, 1990. "Probationary license" means the license issued to any person between sixteen and eighteen years of age to operate a motor vehicle. "Restricted license" means the license issued to any person to operate a motor vehicle subject to conditions or restrictions imposed by the registrar of motor vehicles. "Commercial driver's license" means the license issued to a person under Chapter 4506. of the Revised Code to operate a commercial motor vehicle. "Commercial motor vehicle" has the same meaning as in section 4506.01 of the Revised Code. "Motorcycle operator's temporary instruction permit, license, or endorsement" includes a temporary instruction permit, license, or endorsement for a motor-driven cycle or motor scooter unless otherwise specified. "Motorized bicycle license" means the license issued under section 4511.521 of the Revised Code to any person to operate a motorized bicycle including a "probationary motorized bicycle license." "Probationary motorized bicycle license" means the license issued under section 4511.521 of the Revised Code to any person between fourteen and sixteen years of age to operate a motorized bicycle. "Identification card" means a card issued under sections 4507.50 to 4507.52 of the Revised Code. "Resident" means a person who, in accordance with standards prescribed in rules adopted by the registrar, resides in this state on a permanent basis. "Temporary resident" means a person who, in accordance with standards prescribed in rules adopted by the registrar, resides in this state on a temporary basis. "Photo identification" and "copy" of an individual's photo identification have the same meanings as in section 3501.01 of the Revised Code. (B) In the administration of this chapter and Chapter 4506. of the Revised Code, the registrar has the same authority as is conferred on the registrar by section 4501.02 of the Revised Code. Any act of an authorized deputy registrar of motor vehicles under direction of the registrar is deemed the act of the registrar. To carry out this chapter, the registrar shall appoint such deputy registrars in each county as are necessary. The registrar also shall provide at each place where an application for a driver's or commercial driver's license or identification card may be made the necessary equipment to take a photograph of the applicant for such license or card as required under section 4506.11 or 4507.06 of the Revised Code, to provide a copy of an individual's photo identification as required under section 3509.11 of the Revised Code, and to conduct the vision screenings required by section 4507.12 of the Revised Code. The registrar shall assign one or more deputy registrars to any driver's license examining station operated under the supervision of the director of public safety, whenever the registrar considers such assignment possible. Space shall be provided in the driver's license examining station for any such deputy registrar so assigned. The deputy registrars shall not exercise the powers conferred by such sections upon the registrar, unless they are specifically authorized to exercise such powers by such sections. (C) No agent for any insurance company, writing automobile insurance, shall be appointed deputy registrar, and any such appointment is void. No deputy registrar shall in any manner solicit any form of automobile insurance, nor in any manner advise, suggest, or influence any licensee or applicant for license for or against any kind or type of automobile insurance, insurance company, or agent, nor have the deputy registrar's office directly connected with the office of any automobile insurance agent, nor impart any information furnished by any applicant for a license or identification card to any person, except the registrar. This division shall not apply to any nonprofit corporation appointed deputy registrar. (D) The registrar shall immediately remove a deputy registrar who violates the requirements of this chapter. Section 2. That existing sections 3375.011, 3501.01, 3503.10, 3503.11, 3503.13, 3503.15, 3503.153, 3503.19, 3503.20, 3503.28, 3505.19, 3509.04, 3509.05, 3509.06, 3509.07, 3509.08, 3511.05, 3511.09, 4501.023, and 4507.01 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.